Utah statutes.
53-3-1002.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Ignition interlock system" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-6a-518.2.

(2)  "Ignition interlock system provider" means an individual who:

(a)  is acting on behalf of a business enterprise conducted by a person, association, partnership, or corporation for the purpose of installation and maintenance of an ignition interlock system;

(b)  is certified as an installer;

(c)  has met the requirements for ignition interlock system provider status as established by the division;

(d)  is authorized or certified to operate or manage an ignition interlock system business;

(e)  may supervise the work of another installer; and

(f)  charges a fee for the services described under this Subsection (2).

(3)  "Installer" means a person, whether acting as an ignition interlock system provider or for an ignition interlock system provider for compensation, who is certified by the division to install ignition interlock systems.

(4)  "Interlock restricted driver" has the same meaning as defined in Section 41-6a-518.2.

(5)  "Provider" means an ignition interlock system provider.



Enacted by Chapter 421, 2011 General Session

